Maryland, session 2025, HB1401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
13–1002.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN CALVERT COUNTY.
(B) BY ORDINANCE, THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OF CALVERT COUNTY
MAY:
(1) AUTHORIZE THE COUNTY ATTORNEY OR THE STATE’S ATTORNEY
FOR CALVERT COUNTY TO PROHIBIT A FUTURE EVENT OR GATHERING IF THE
FUTURE EVENT OR GATHERING HAS A SUBSTANTIAL LIKELIHOOD OF CREATING:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1401*

HOUSE BILL 1401
(I) A NUISANCE; OR
(II) A DISTURBANCE OF THE PEACEFUL ENJOYMENT OF
PRIVATE OR PUBLIC PROPERTY; AND
(2) ESTABLISH PENALTIES AND ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS FOR A
VIOLATION OF A PROHIBITION ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN ORDINANCE
ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.